Hawaii, session 2026, SB3224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 166-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if any lessee holds a lease having a remaining term of fifteen years or less, the department may extend the term of the lease for an additional thirty years; provided that the land covered by the lease is[: (1)  Twenty-five] twenty-five acres or less[; and (2)  Located in a county having a population of less than five hundred thousand]." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________